Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.197

Issuance of temporary parenting plan—Criteria.

After considering the affidavit required by RCW 26.09.194(1) and other relevant evidence presented, the court shall make a temporary parenting plan that is in the best interest of the child. In making this determination, the court shall give particular consideration to:

(1) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's relationship with each parent; and

(2) Which parenting arrangements will cause the least disruption to the child's emotional stability while the action is pending.

The court shall also consider the factors used to determine residential provisions in the permanent parenting plan.

[ 2007 c 496 s 604; 1987 c 460 s 14.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.